Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-803
Commission of Industrial Relations; created.

In order to carry out the public policy of the State of Nebraska as set forth in section 48-802, there is hereby created an industrial commission to be known as the Commission of Industrial Relations.

Laws 1947, c. 178, § 3, p. 588;

Laws 1979, LB 444, § 1.